California statutes. Fish and Game Code
(e) Popups shall not be used on buoy lines attached to finfish traps, and shall not be possessed aboard a vessel when taking finfish under a general trap permit.

(f) Trap destruction devices used on finfish traps shall conform to the current regulatory requirements for those devices pursuant to Section 9003 and as adopted by the commission.

(g) No finfish traps shall be set within 750 feet of any pier,
 breakwall, or jetty in District 6, 7, 17, 18, 19, 19A, 19B, 20, 20A, or 21.

(h) No more than 50 finfish traps may be used in state waters along the mainland shore.

(i) The mesh of any finfish trap used pursuant to this section shall measure not less than two inches by two inches.

(j) The following fish shall not be used as bait in finfish traps:

(1) Lobster.

(2) Crabs of the genus cancer, except rock crab, yellow crab, and red crab, as identified in Section 8282, which may be used as bait under the authority of a rock crab trap permit issued pursuant to Section 8282.

(3) Any other finfish or invertebrate to which a minimum
 size limit applies that is used or possessed in a condition so that its size can not be determined.

(k) Lobster may be possessed aboard or landed from any vessel on which finfish are also present, if every person aboard the vessel has a valid lobster permit that has not been suspended or revoked and complies with Article 5 (commencing with Section 8250) of Chapter 2, this article, and the regulations adopted pursuant thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 174.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

9001.8.

Sablefish may be taken under a general trap permit in ocean waters between a line extending due west true from Point Arguello in Santa Barbara County and the United States-Mexico international boundary line, if all of the following criteria are also met:

(a) The trap shall be six feet or less in its greatest dimension.

(b) The mesh of any trap used for sablefish pursuant to this section shall measure not less than two inches by two inches.

(c) The traps may be used only in waters 200 fathoms or deeper.

(d) No permittee may possess aboard a vessel at the same time, sablefish traps and any other commercial fishing gear, except that spot prawn traps may be possessed during spot prawn trap open fishing periods as established by the commission and if the permittee has a valid spot prawn trap vessel permit that has not been suspended or revoked.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 431, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

9002.

(a) Except as provided in subdivisions (b), (c), and (d), it is unlawful to willfully or recklessly disturb, move, or damage any trap that belongs to another person and that is marked with a buoy identification number pursuant to Section 9006.

(b) A person, who has been issued a general trap permit under Section 9001 and has it in his or her possession, may pull or raise a trap marked with a buoy, if the buoy is marked with a buoy identification number pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 9006. A person pulling or raising a trap marked with a buoy identification number, other than his or her own buoy identification number, shall have written permission in his or her possession from the other person who holds the buoy identification number that is marked on the buoy.

(c) Subdivision (a) does not apply to employees of the department while engaged in the performance of official duties.

(d) (1) Subdivision (a) does not apply to publicly employed safety personnel, including, but not limited to, lifeguards, marine safety officers, harbor patrol officers, and peace officers, who, while engaged in the performance of their official duties, may remove a trap, buoy, or line located in or near breaking surf or adjacent to a public beach if they believe that the trap poses a public safety hazard. If any of those persons remove a trap, a buoy, or a trap or buoy line, any captured marine life shall be immediately returned to the ocean.

(2) Any person described in this subdivision who removes a trap and any attachments thereto identified by a buoy identification number shall make an attempt to contact the person whose permit or license number is marked on the buoy by personal contact, by telephone, by recorded message left on a telephone answering machine, by regular United States Postal Service, or by other means, advising where the property is located. Those persons shall have no responsibility to secure the trap or attachments against loss or damage.

(3) Employees of the department may disclose the name, address, and buoy identification numbers of currently permitted or licensed persons to representatives of public safety agencies described in this subdivision to assist in the return of traps and attachments to their proper owners or operators.

(4) If the person whose permit or license number is marked on the buoy has been notified pursuant to this subdivision but has not retrieved the trap within seven days of notification, or if that person cannot be identified within seven days after the trap has been removed, the trap may be discarded.

(5) This subdivision does not create any duty on any state or local agency to remove or move a trap, line, or buoy that may endanger the public safety and does not create any liability pursuant to Part 2 (commencing with Section 814) of Division 3.6 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1047, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

9002.5.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 9002, the department, in consultation with the Dungeness crab task force, shall establish a retrieval program to provide for the retrieval of lost or abandoned commercial Dungeness crab traps by June 30, 2019.

(b) The retrieval program developed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be consistent with all of the following:

(1) (A) The department shall establish a retrieval permit that grants a person who obtains a retrieval permit the authority to retrieve Dungeness crab traps located in ocean waters belonging to another person without written permission from that person during
 both of the following periods of time:

(i) The closed season of the Dungeness crab commercial fishery, as described in Section 8276.

(ii) A period of time other than the time period described in clause (i) in which the director restricts the take of Dungeness crab pursuant to Section 8276.1 or regulations adopted pursuant to that section, if the director authorizes retrieval permitholders to retrieve traps during that time period.

(B) The department may establish any qualifications it deems necessary for a person to obtain a retrieval permit.

(C) The department shall require a permit fee in an amount necessary to fully recover, but not exceed, all reasonable administrative
 and implementation costs to the department of the retrieval program.

(2) Notwithstanding Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 2080) of Title 6 of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code or any other law, any Dungeness crab trap retrieved under the authority of a retrieval permit shall become the property of the retrieval permitholder.

(3) The department shall require a retrieval permitholder to notify the former trap owner of the retrieval of a Dungeness crab trap and to offer to sell the trap to the former owner for a reasonable recovery fee, as determined by the retrieval permitholder, based on the cost of trap retrieval and storage of the trap. The department shall impose per-trap fees on any former trap owner who refuses to pay the recovery fee to the retrieval permitholder.
 The department shall set the rate of these per-trap fees at a level sufficient to recover any costs to the department from handling noncompliance with the gear retrieval program and to reimburse the retrieval permitholder for the reasonable cost of trap retrieval, storage, and disposal of crab traps belonging to a former owner who refuses to pay the recovery fees for those traps and, upon appropriation by the Legislature, shall use the proceeds of the per-trap fees for these purposes. The department shall annually adjust the per-trap fees pursuant to Section 713.

(4) Notwithstanding Section 8022, the department may release contact information to a retrieval permitholder for purposes of the retrieval program under terms and conditions as the department deems necessary to preserve the confidentiality of the information released. Any
 release of information pursuant to this section does not constitute a waiver of any applicable exemptions from disclosure under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(5) The department may deny an application for renewal or transfer of a Dungeness crab vessel permit until the applicant pays any fees imposed pursuant to paragraph (3).

(6) The department shall submit the proposed retrieval program developed pursuant to this section to the Dungeness crab task force for review, and shall not implement the retrieval program until the task force has had 60 days or more to review the proposed retrieval program and recommend any proposed changes. The director may implement the retrieval program earlier than
 60 days after it is submitted to the Dungeness crab task force for review, if recommended by the task force.

(c) This section shall become inoperative on April 1, 2029, and, as of January 1, 2030, is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, that becomes operative on or before January 1, 2030, deletes or extends the dates on which it becomes inoperative and is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 118.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.   Inoperative April 1, 2029.    Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

9003.

Every trap shall have at least one destruction device which meets specifications approved by the department. In order to minimize the adverse effects on living marine resources, the specifications for destruction devices shall provide for a device that destructs rapidly enough to facilitate escape of a substantial proportion of all species confined in the trap from any trap that cannot be raised.

(History: Amended (as added by Sec. 20) by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1271, Sec. 23.)
-------------------------------------------

9004.

Every trap shall be raised, cleaned, serviced, and emptied at intervals, not to exceed 96 hours, weather conditions at sea permitting, and no trap shall be abandoned in the waters of this state.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1271, Sec. 20.)
-------------------------------------------

9005.

Every trap or string of traps shall be marked with a buoy. The department shall implement regulations by January 1, 2020, requiring standardized gear marking for those fisheries in which the department determines it is appropriate. As part of the regulations, the department shall establish a fee for each fishery requiring standardized gear marking pursuant to this section and shall set and adjust each fee in an amount to fully recover, but not exceed, all reasonable administrative and implementation costs of the department
 relating to the standardized gear marking requirement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 985, Sec. 11.   (SB 1309)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

9006.

Every trap used to take finfish or crustaceans shall be marked with a buoy. Each buoy shall be marked to identify the operator as follows:

(a) For a trap used to take lobster the commercial fishing license identification number followed by the letter “P.”

(b) For a trap used to take Dungeness crab or hagfish, the commercial fishing license identification number only.

(c) For a trap used to take finfish other than sablefish or hagfish, the commercial fishing license identification number followed by the letter “Z.”

(d) For a trap used to take sablefish, the commercial fishing license identification number followed by the letter “B.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 431, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

9007.

Any trap used without a buoy, or with a buoy which is not marked pursuant to Section 9006, is a public nuisance and shall be removed from the waters of this state by any person authorized to enforce this code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1271, Sec. 20.)
-------------------------------------------

9008.

Any trap used in violation of this code, or any regulations adopted pursuant thereto, is a public nuisance and, except as provided in Section 9007, shall be seized pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 8630) of Chapter 3.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1271, Sec. 20.)
-------------------------------------------

9010.

(a) Subject to Article 5 (commencing with Section 8250) of Chapter 2, spiny lobster may be taken with lobster traps under a lobster permit issued pursuant to Section 8254.

(b) Notwithstanding Sections 8660 and 8665, lobster traps may be used in any area of the state not otherwise closed to the taking of lobsters up to, but not closer than, 75 feet of any private pier, wharf, jetty, breakwater, or dock.

(c) A wire lobster trap shall be built of rectangular wire mesh with inside mesh measurement not less than 112 inches by
 312 inches, the 312-inch measurement to be parallel to the floor of the trap. A wire lobster trap shall be fitted with at least one rigid rectangular escape gap with an inside vertical measurement not less than 238 inches at all points and an inside horizontal measurement of not less than 1112 inches at all points. The horizontal sides of the escape gap shall be located parallel to, and the escape gap within 238 inches of the floor on any outside wall of, the rearmost chamber of the lobster trap and shall be
 clearly accessible to the lobsters.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (c), wire may be used to hold the escape gap in place that reduces the inside vertical or horizontal measurement of the escape gap specified in subdivision (c), but only if all of the following requirements are met:

(1) The overall diameter of the wire, including any coating on the wire, shall measure less than 0.176 inches in diameter (the diameter of 7 SWG gauge wire using the Standard Wire Gauge (SWG) standard of measurement).

(2) A maximum of one wire wrap shall be located on each vertical side of the escape gap.

(3) A maximum of two wire wraps shall be located on the bottom horizontal side of the
 escape gap.

(4) Wire shall not be used on the top horizontal side of the escape gap.

(5) Each wire shall be tightly wrapped against the inside surface of the escape gap and shall not pass over the inside surface more than once. As used in this paragraph, “tightly wrapped” means no space exists at any point between the wire and the inside surface of the escape gap. 

(e) A lobster trap constructed of lath or other material shall have an opening to allow a means of escape along the full length of one side of the rearmost chamber. The escape opening shall be of a spacing of not less than 238 inches, and the spacing shall be located
 parallel to, and within 238 inches of, the floor of the lobster trap.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 565, Sec. 2.   (AB 291)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

9011.

(a) (1) Subject to Article 6 (commencing with Section 8275) of Chapter 2, Dungeness crab, as defined in Section 8275, may be taken with Dungeness crab traps.

(2) A Dungeness crab trap may have any number of openings of any size. However, every Dungeness crab trap shall have at least two rigid circular openings of not less than 414 inches, inside diameter, on the top or side of the trap. If both of the openings are located on the side of the trap, at least one of the openings shall be located so that at least one-half of the opening is in the upper half of the trap.

(3) Subject to
 Article 6 (commencing with Section 8275) of Chapter 2, rock crab may be taken incidentally with a Dungeness crab trap used pursuant to this subdivision to take Dungeness crab, provided that the incidental taking occurs only during the season when it is lawful to take both species. A rock crab, taken incidentally with a Dungeness crab trap, that does not comply with Article 6 (commencing with Section 8275) of Chapter 2, shall be immediately returned to the waters from which it was taken.

(b) (1) Subject to Article 6 (commencing with Section 8275) of Chapter 2, rock crab, as defined in Section 8275, may be taken with rock crab traps.

(2) A rock crab trap may have any number of openings of any size. However, a rock crab trap constructed of wire mesh with an inside mesh measurement of not less than
 178 inches by 378 inches, with the 378 inch measurement parallel to the floor, shall have at least one rigid circular opening of not less than 314 inches, inside diameter, located on any outside wall of the rearmost chamber of the crab trap and shall be located so that at least one-half of the opening is in the upper half of the trap. Rock crab traps constructed of other material shall have at least two rigid circular openings of not less than 314 inches, inside diameter, on the top or side of the rearmost
 chamber of the trap. If both of the openings are located on the side of the trap, at least one of the openings shall be located so that at least one-half of the opening is in the upper half of the trap. No rigid circular opening, as required, shall extend more than 12 inch beyond the plane of the wall side or top of the trap in which it is located, and it shall be clearly accessible to any crab which may be in the trap.

(3) Subject to Article 6 (commencing with Section 8275) of Chapter 2, Dungeness crab may be taken incidentally with a rock crab trap used pursuant to this subdivision to take rock crab, provided that the incidental taking occurs only during the season when it is lawful to take both species. A Dungeness crab, taken incidentally with a rock crab trap, that does not comply with Article 6 (commencing with Section 8275) of Chapter 2,
 shall be immediately returned to the waters from which it was taken.

(4) A person shall not possess any lobster aboard a vessel while the vessel is being used pursuant to this subdivision to take rock crab.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 175.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

9012.

(a) No vessel may be used to take and land crab for both commercial and sport purposes in the same day.

(b) In Districts 6, 7, 8, and 9, no trap shall be used to take Dungeness crab if that trap is attached to another trap or other traps by a common line.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 973, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

9015.

(a) Subject to Article 18 (commencing with Section 8590) of Chapter 2, prawns or shrimp, as defined in Section 8590, may be taken with prawn traps or shrimp traps under a general trap permit issued pursuant to Section 9001.

(b) A prawn trap or a shrimp trap shall be six feet or less in its greatest dimension. Every opening from the exterior to the interior of a prawn trap or a shrimp trap shall be five inches or less in any dimension.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1271, Sec. 20.)
-------------------------------------------

9020.

(a) Subject to Section 8400, California killifish (Fundulus parvipinnis), mudsuckers (Gillichthys mirabilis), yellowfin gobies (Acanthogobius flavimanus), shiner perch (Cymatogaster aggregata), and staghorn sculpin (Leptocottus armatus) may be taken with baitfish traps under a general trap permit issued pursuant to Section 9001.

(b) A baitfish trap shall not exceed 12 inches in width, 12 inches in height, and 36 inches in greatest length with entrance at small ends of funnels or fykes not to exceed 2 inches in diameter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1009, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

9022.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 9000, traps used to take fin fish may not be used in Districts 10, 11, and 12, except for bait fish traps as provided for in Sections 8400 and 9020.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (a), all marine species of fin fish subject to Section 8403 may be taken with one or more fin fish traps as prescribed by the commission under a general trap permit issued pursuant to Section 9001.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1370, Sec. 37.   Effective October 27, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

9023.

(a) Traps may be used throughout the year to take carp in any district under the restrictions set forth in subdivision (b).

(b) Traps shall not exceed six feet in greatest dimension. They shall be made of cotton or nylon twine. Meshes shall not be less than three and one-half inches in length, except that fyke and bait bags may be any size mesh. Traps shall have only a single vertical fyke opening at the top of the trap. They shall be baited only with grain or grain products. Fish other than carp taken in traps subject to this section shall be immediately returned to the water.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 193.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

9024.

Crayfish traps may be used at any time in any district to take crayfish only. Traps shall not exceed three feet in greatest dimension. Any other species taken with crayfish traps shall be returned to the water immediately. The commission may prohibit the use of crayfish traps which will injure fish or which will entrap unnecessarily large numbers of fish other than crayfish.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1442, Sec. 20.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Fishing Lines [9025.1. - 9029.5.]

9025.1.

The Legislature finds and declares that it is in the best interest of the people of the state and California’s marine resources and fisheries that the use of commercial hook and line fishing gear be regulated in a manner that assures the orderly development of the fisheries, maintenance of viable resources, and sustainable and satisfying commercial and recreational harvests.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 827, Sec. 2.5.   Effective October 13, 1995.   Operative January 1, 1996, by Sec. 8 of Ch. 827.)
-------------------------------------------

9025.5.

(a) Troll lines or handlines having not more than two hooks (plugs excepted) may be used in any district, and troll lines with more than two hooks may be used in Fish and Game Districts 6, 7, 10, 16, 17, 18, 19, and 19A, and that portion of Fish and Game District 11 west of the Golden Gate Bridge.

(b) “Troll line” means a line with one or more hooks towed by a vessel underway and making way.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), in that portion of Fish and Game District 10 in Tomales Bay south of a line extending 252 degrees magnetic from the western tip of Toms Point to the opposite shore, in that portion of Fish and Game District 11 east of the Golden Gate Bridge, and in Fish and Game Districts 12 and 13, commercial fishermen shall not use more than four troll lines or handlines at any time with not more than two hooks attached to each line, and when more than one commercial fisherman is aboard a vessel, not more than six lines with a maximum of two hooks per line may be fished aboard that vessel.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 9025 by Stats. 1995, Ch. 677, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

9026.

Set lines may be used in Districts 6, 7, 10, 17, 18, and 19. It is unlawful to use set lines with hooks more than 100 feet above the anchor or ocean bottom.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 318, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

9027.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding Section 9026, 9028, or 9029, in the area described in subdivision (b), it is unlawful to use more than 150 hooks on a vessel to take a fish for commercial purposes when using fishing lines authorized pursuant to this article.

(2) In the area described in subdivision (b), not more than 15 hooks shall be attached to any one fishing line, and no fishing line shall be attached to another fishing line, while those lines are being used for commercial fishing pursuant to this article except that a single troll line with not more than 30 hooks may be used to take California halibut.

(3) Each fishing line used pursuant to this article that is not attached to a vessel fishing in the area described in subdivision (b) shall be buoyed and the commercial fishing license identification number issued pursuant to Section 7850 to the permittee who is using the fishing line shall be marked on, and visible on the upper one-half of each buoy, in numbers at least two inches high.

(b) This section applies only to waters within one mile of shore within Fish and Game Districts 6, 7, and 10, but not including ocean waters in Fish and Game District 7 between a line extending 203 degrees magnetic from Gitchell Creek and a line extending 252 degrees magnetic from False Cape in Humboldt County and not including ocean waters in Fish and Game District 10 between a line extending 245 degrees magnetic from the most westerly point of the west point of the Point Reyes headlands in Marin County and a line extending due west magnetic from Point Bolinas in Marin County.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 431, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

9027.5.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding Section 9026, 9028, or 9029 in the area described in subdivision (b), it is unlawful to use more than 150 hooks on a vessel to take fish for commercial purposes when using fishing lines authorized pursuant to this article.

(2) In the area described in subdivision (b), no more than 15 hooks shall be attached to any one fishing line, and no fishing line shall be attached to another fishing line, while those lines are being used for commercial fishing pursuant to this article.

(3) Each fishing line used pursuant to this article that is not attached to a vessel fishing in the area
 described in subdivision (b) shall be buoyed and the commercial fishing license identification number issued pursuant to Section 7852 to the permittee who is using the fishing line shall be marked on, and visible on the upper one-half of each buoy, in numbers not less than two inches in height.

(b) This section applies only to waters within one mile of the mainland shore in Fish and Game Districts 17, 18, and 19.

(c) Subdivision (a) does not apply to persons who are fishing for halibut, white sea bass, sharks, skates, or rays, south of a line extending due west from Point Conception, if at least 80 percent of the fish possessed by persons aboard the vessel are, by number, halibut, white sea bass, sharks, skates, or rays.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 80, Sec. 49.   (SB 1525)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

9028.

Notwithstanding Sections 8603 and 9025.5, it is unlawful to use fishing lines, including, but not limited to, troll lines and handlines more than 900 feet in length unless they are used as set lines pursuant to Sections 8601 and 9026 or they are used as part of deep-set buoy gear authorized under federal law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 844, Sec. 9.   (SB 1017)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

9029.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 9028, a fishing line which is anchored to the ocean bottom at one end and attached at the surface to a fishing vessel or a buoy may be used in Districts 6, 7, 10, 17, 18, and 19. 

(b) A fishing line otherwise permitted pursuant to subdivision (a), may not be used under any of the following circumstances: 

(1) To take shortfin mako (bonito) sharks, thresher sharks, swordfish, or marlin. 

(2) If the fishing line exceeds 3,000 feet in length from the anchor to the surface vessel or buoy. 

(3) If any hooks are attached to the upper one-third of the line. 

(c) A buoy attached to the surface end of a fishing line used pursuant to subdivision (a) shall display above its waterline, in numerals at least two inches high, the fisherman’s identification number. For purposes of this section and Section 8601.5, “fisherman’s identification number” means the number of the person’s commercial fishing license issued pursuant to Section 7850.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 485, Sec. 5.   Effective October 4, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

9029.5.

Notwithstanding Sections 9025.5, 9026, and 9029, it is unlawful to use set lines, vertical fishing lines, or troll lines to take fish for commercial purposes within one mile of the nearest point of land on the mainland shore in Fish and Game District 7 or 10 from sunset on Friday to sunset on the following Sunday or from sunset of the day before a state recognized legal holiday until sunset on that holiday. For the purposes of this subdivision, a “set line” is a fishing line that is anchored to the bottom on each end and is not free to drift with the tide or current and a “vertical fishing line” is a fishing line that is anchored to the ocean bottom at one end and attached at the other end on the surface to a fishing vessel or a buoy. This section does not apply to the taking of salmon or California halibut for commercial purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 431, Sec. 28.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Other Appliances [9050. - 9056.]

9050.

A spade, shovel, hoe, rake, or other appliance operated by hand may be used to take mollusks, sand crabs, and shrimps in Districts 1, 112, 2, 212, 3, 312, 4, 418, 434, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13, 16, 17, 18, 19, 19A, 20, 20A, and 21, except as specified in Section 7332, except that freshwater clams shall not be taken
 by means of any of those appliances on any levee or on the berm of any levee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 177.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

9051.

(a) Spears, harpoons, and bows and arrows may be used for taking all varieties of skates, rays, and sharks, except soupfin sharks.

(b) This section shall become operative January 1, 1999.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 4) and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1174, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.   Section operative January 1, 1999, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

9052.

Slurp guns may be used to take fish for commercial purposes in fish and game districts 6, 7, 10, 17, 18, 19, 20, and 20A.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 742, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

9053.

(a) Powered equipment of such design as may be prescribed by the commission may be used to take crustaceans and mollusks under a revocable permit issued by the department and under such regulations as the commission shall prescribe.

(b) Taking of lobster or crabs under this section is subject to Article 5 (commencing with Section 8250) and Article 6 (commencing with Section 8275) of Chapter 2 of Part 3 of Division 6.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1442, Sec. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

9054.

Sea urchins shall not be taken for commercial purposes except under a valid sea urchin diving permit issued to that person that has not been suspended or revoked, subject to regulations adopted by the commission. Rakes, airlifts, or other handheld appliances may be used to take sea urchins. The commission may, whenever necessary to prevent overutilization or to ensure efficient and economic operation of the fishery, limit the number of permits that may be issued. The commission, as it determines appropriate to protect the resource, may limit the number of permits either on a statewide basis or within selected geographical areas.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 870, Sec. 52.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

9054.5.

The commission shall adopt regulations related to commercial sea urchin diving permits, and the vessels used to commercially fish for sea urchin, in order to better manage the number of permits issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 876, Sec. 16.   (SB 500)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

9055.

(a) The base fee for a sea urchin permit authorized pursuant to Section 9054 is five hundred ninety-eight
 dollars and fifty cents ($598.50).

(b) Upon notification from the California Sea Urchin Commission, the department shall charge an additional two hundred dollars ($200) for a sea urchin permit to be distributed to the California Sea Urchin Commission by the department, less the department’s distribution expenses, to be used for the purposes of Section 79056 of the Food and Agricultural Code. The California Sea Urchin Commission shall notify the department of the intent to charge the additional two-hundred-dollar ($200) fee by December 1 of the preceding license year.

(c) The base fee and additional two-hundred-dollar ($200) fee for the California Sea Urchin Commission specified in this section are applicable to the 2024 license year and shall be adjusted annually
 thereafter pursuant to Section 713.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 876, Sec. 17.   (SB 500)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

9056.

The department shall adopt regulations regarding the marking and color coding of lines used in state managed fisheries.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 876, Sec. 18.   (SB 500)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Fuel Conservation Assistance Program [9100. - 9101.]

9100.

The California Energy Extension Service of the Office of Planning and Research shall implement a revolving loan fund program to assist low-income fishing fleet operators reduce their energy costs and conserve fuel by providing low-interest loans to those operators.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 967, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

9101.

Commencing January 1, 1994, and thereafter biennially, the California Energy Extension Service of the Office of Planning and Research shall report to the Legislature on the status of the loan program, including the number and the amounts of loans made, the amount of loans repaid, and a comparison of the ethnic background of the loan recipients with the ethnic background of the low-income fishing fleet operators.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 967, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 6.5. STURGEON EGG PROCESSORS [10000. - 10005.]

10000.

(a) Every person engaged in the business of canning, curing, preserving, packing, or otherwise processing, or dealing at wholesale in, the eggs of sturgeon for human consumption shall obtain a sturgeon egg processing license from the department for that purpose. The license required by this division is in addition to any other license, permit, or other authorization required by this code or by any other provision of law.

(b) Possession of a sturgeon egg processing license issued pursuant to this division authorizes the licensee to can, cure, preserve, pack, or otherwise process, or deal at wholesale in, the eggs of sturgeon if, and only if, the eggs are lawfully taken or lawfully possessed pursuant to Section 7230 or
 7370.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 178.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10001.

A sturgeon egg processing license shall be issued and delivered upon application and the payment of a base fee of one hundred dollars ($100), as adjusted under Section 713, to the department. The license shall be valid for a period of 12 months from the date of issuance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1403, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

10002.

Every person licensed pursuant to this division shall make a true and legible record of each transaction involving the eggs of sturgeon. This documentation shall show all of the following:

(a) The weight of the eggs received by the licensee.

(b) The date the eggs were received by the licensee.

(c) The name and address of the person from whom the licensee received the eggs.

(d) If any of the sturgeon that produced the eggs were artificially propagated by a person other than the person named pursuant to subdivision (c), the name and address of the person who
 artificially propagated the sturgeon.

(e) If the person named pursuant to subdivision (c) received any of the sturgeon that produced the eggs from another person, the name and address of that person.

(f) If any of the sturgeon that produced the eggs were imported into this state, the place where those sturgeon were taken.

(g) Whether the eggs are to be processed by the licensee or sold to another person for processing. In addition, if the eggs are to be sold to another person for processing, the name and address of that person.

(h) Any other information that the department may specify as required on any form provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 179.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10003.

The documentation required by Section 10002 shall be kept by the person or business holding the sturgeon egg processing license for a period of two years from the date of receipt of eggs and shall be available for inspection during normal business hours by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1403, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

10004.

Any information received or requested by the department shall be confidential, and the records shall not be public records, except that the information contained in the records may be compiled and published as summaries in a manner that will not disclose the individual record or business of any person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1403, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

10005.

(a) Any person convicted of a violation of this division or a violation of any other provision of this code or any regulation adopted pursuant thereto relating to sturgeon shall be prohibited from engaging in the business of canning, curing, preserving, packing, or otherwise processing, or dealing at wholesale or retail in the eggs of sturgeon in this state for one year from the date of the conviction.

(b) Any person convicted of a second or subsequent violation of this division or a violation of any other provision of this code or any regulation adopted pursuant thereto relating to sturgeon within five years of another offense resulting in a conviction of a violation of any of those provisions is prohibited from engaging in any activity for which a sturgeon egg processing license is required for five years from the date of the last conviction.

(c) The commission shall revoke any license issued pursuant to this division to the person who is prohibited from engaging in that business under this section. No sturgeon egg processing license revoked pursuant to this section shall be issued, reissued, or reinstated during the period of prohibition prescribed in this section.
